src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Northern Haida verb affixes                       

LEXICON CLASS-AA 

LEXICON CLASS-AAL 

LEXICON CLASS-AAL-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AAN 

LEXICON CLASS-AAN-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AANG 

LEXICON CLASS-AANG-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AAW 

LEXICON CLASS-AAW-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AAY 

LEXICON CLASS-AAY-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AH 

LEXICON CLASS-AH-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AYD 

LEXICON CLASS-AYD-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-EE 

LEXICON CLASS-EE-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-EED 

LEXICON CLASS-EED-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-I 

LEXICON CLASS-I-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IID 

LEXICON CLASS-IID-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-U 

LEXICON CLASS-U-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AAHL 

LEXICON CLASS-AAHL-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AD 

LEXICON CLASS-AD-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AD-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AL 

LEXICON CLASS-AL-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AL-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AN 

LEXICON CLASS-AN-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AN-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-ANG 

LEXICON CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AW 

LEXICON CLASS-AW-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AW-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AY 

LEXICON CLASS-AY-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AY-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-EEHL 

LEXICON CLASS-EEHL-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-EEHL-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-ID 

LEXICON CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-II 

LEXICON CLASS-II-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-II-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IN 

LEXICON CLASS-IN-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IN-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-ING 

LEXICON CLASS-ING-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-ING-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UD 

LEXICON CLASS-UD-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UD-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UN 

LEXICON CLASS-UN-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UN-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UNG 

LEXICON CLASS-UNG-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UNG-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UU 

LEXICON CLASS-UU-STEM-1-INFL   

LEXICON CLASS-UU-STEM-2-INFL  

LEXICON CLASS-A 

LEXICON CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  

LEXICON CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-A.A 

LEXICON CLASS-A.A-STEM-1-INFL  

LEXICON CLASS-A.A-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AHL 

LEXICON CLASS-AHL-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AS 

LEXICON CLASS-AS-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AS-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-AS-STEM-3-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-E.E 

LEXICON CLASS-E.E-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-E.E-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-E.EHL 

LEXICON CLASS-E.EHL-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-E.EHL-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IHL 

LEXICON CLASS-IHL-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IHL-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IHL-STEM-3-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IIHL 

LEXICON CLASS-IIHL-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IIHL-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IIHL-STEM-3-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IS 

LEXICON CLASS-IS-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IS-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-IS-STEM-3-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UHL 

LEXICON CLASS-UHL-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UHL-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UHL-STEM-3-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-US 

LEXICON CLASS-US-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-US-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-US-STEM-3-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UUHL 

LEXICON CLASS-UUHL-STEM-1-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2-INFL 

LEXICON CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3-INFL 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-hdn/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
